Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-3207
Administration of oaths.

County assessors and their deputies may administer oaths within their respective counties in matters pertaining to their official duties.

Laws 1990, LB 821, § 22.

Fees for taking acknowledgments, oaths, and affirmations, disposition, see section 33-153.